src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON prop
m1 ;

LEXICON PROP
+N+Prop: K ;

LEXICON PROP-surfem
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: K ;
+N+Prop+Fem: K ;

LEXICON PROP-surmal
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: K ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: K ;

LEXICON PROP-malfem
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: K ;
+N+Prop+Fem: K ;

LEXICON PROP-surplc
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: K ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: K ;

LEXICON PROP-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: K ;

LEXICON PROP-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: K ;

LEXICON PROP-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: K ;

LEXICON PROP-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: K ;

LEXICON PROP-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: K ;

LEXICON PROP-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: K ;

LEXICON PROP-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: K ;
