src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Divvun PROP-org ;
AP PROP-org ;
Adige PROP-org ;
Adjagas PROP ; ! sub?
Aida PROP-fem ;
Aineas PROP-mal ;
Akademikerne PROP-org ;
Akaia PROP-plc ;
Aksum PROP-sur ;
Alajoki PROP-surplc ;
Alfhild PROP-fem ;
Allah PROP-mal ;
Almenningen PROP-obj ;
Alta PROP-plc ;
Andebu PROP ;
Andrine PROP-fem ;
Androklus PROP-surmal ;
Anjala PROP-plc ;
Ann-Kristin PROP-fem ;
Anneli PROP-fem ;
Anthony PROP-mal ;
Anttila PROP-sur ;
Arcturus PROP-surmal ;
Argus PROP-org ;
Ariane PROP-fem ;
Aritzby PROP ;
Armani PROP-obj ;
Arnstein PROP-mal ;
Arvika PROP-plc ;
Augusta PROP-fem ;
Augustenborg PROP-surplc ;
Austvatn PROP-plc ;
Autero PROP-sur ;
Ašbel PROP-mal ;
Aškenas PROP ;
BNP PROP-obj ;
BT PROP-org ;
Bardal PROP-plc ;
Basemat PROP-obj ;
Basilicæ PROP ;
Bender PROP-sur ;
Benthe PROP-fem ;
Bergenhus PROP-plc ;
Bergsmo PROP ;
Bert PROP-mal ;
Bertine PROP-fem ;
Bikini PROP-obj ;
Bjoner PROP-sur ;
Bjølstadmo PROP ;
Bjørghild PROP-fem ;
Bjørkesvingen PROP-plc ;
Bjørnerud PROP-surplc ;
Blylaget PROP-org ;
Bolkesjø PROP ;
Bonn PROP-plc ;
Borgund PROP-sur ;
Borsæ PROP ;
Brage PROP-mal ;
Breiðamerkursandur PROP-plc ;
Brunen PROP-ani ;
Bruusgaard PROP-sur ;
Brynhild PROP-fem ;
Brørup PROP-surplc ;
Budweiser PROP-obj ;
Bøverbru PROP ;
Cali PROP-sur ;
Cambrai PROP-plc ;
Camelus PROP-surmal ;
Cappelen PROP-org ;
Cathrine PROP-fem ;
Central PROP-obj ;
Charles PROP-mal ;
Cicilie PROP-fem ;
Clipart PROP-obj ;
Control PROP-org ;
Costa PROP-obj ;
Cølius PROP-sur ;
Dagrun PROP-fem ;
Dalsgård PROP-plc ;
Damokles PROP-mal ;
Danø PROP ;
Decatur PROP-org ;
Diplomatarium PROP-obj ;
Dorothea PROP-fem ;
Dreyer PROP-sur ;
Dubrovnik PROP-obj ;
Dypendalen PROP-plc ;
Dyrkorn PROP-surplc ;
EU PROP-org ;
Eau PROP ;
Edvard PROP-mal ;
Edvarda PROP-fem ;
Eiendommsretten PROP-obj ;
Eira PROP-surfem ;
Elektra PROP-obj ;
Elin PROP-fem ;
Elmer PROP-mal ;
Elna PROP-fem ;
Enoš PROP-surmal ;
Ensjø PROP ;
Ephesus PROP-surmal ;
Erdal PROP-plc ;
Erika PROP-fem ;
Erindringen PROP-org ;
Esau PROP-mal ;
Escort PROP-obj ;
Espeseth PROP-sur ;
Etelämäki PROP-surplc ;
Eurokas PROP-ani ;
Farris PROP-obj ;
Feda PROP-fem ;
Fenris PROP-ani ;
Fenrisulven PROP-ani ;
Ferie PROP-org ;
Festus PROP-mal ;
Finnmarkens PROP-obj ;
Fiskene PROP-org ;
Fiuren PROP-plc ;
Fjerdingby PROP ;
Flexplan PROP-obj ;
Foiniks PROP-ani ;
Follebu PROP ;
Forhandlinger PROP-obj ;
Forut PROP-org ;
Fosstveit PROP-sur ;
Foulum PROP-obj ;
Fride PROP-fem ;
Fridtjov PROP-mal ;
Furunes PROP-plc ;
Fylkesplan PROP-obj ;
Føniks PROP-ani ;
Ganddal PROP-surplc ;
General PROP-org ;
Germanicus PROP-surmal ;
Giuseppe PROP-mal ;
Glarbo PROP ;
Glossarium PROP-obj ;
Gogh PROP-sur ;
Gorgonzola PROP-plc ;
Greta PROP-fem ;
Gråen PROP-ani ;
Gullborg PROP-surplc ;
Gunlaug PROP-fem ;
Gunstein PROP-mal ;
Hafsø PROP ;
Hagvedt PROP-sur ;
Hajduk PROP-plc ;
Hakamäki PROP-surplc ;
Haldis PROP-fem ;
Hammond PROP-mal ;
Haukijärvi PROP-surplc ;
Haxthow PROP-sur ;
Hedemarkens PROP-obj ;
Heiby PROP ;
Helleland PROP-surplc ;
Helmstedt PROP-plc ;
Helse PROP-org ;
Helvind PROP-mal ;
Herdis PROP-fem ;
Hildebrand PROP-mal ;
Hilleren PROP-sur ;
Hirvasniemi PROP-surplc ;
Honkavaara PROP-surplc ;
Honoré PROP ;
Huesca PROP-plc ;
Hullth PROP-sur ;
Härmälä PROP-surplc ;
Høie PROP ;
Høsten PROP-org ;
Høyesterett PROP-obj ;
Ilia PROP-mal ;
Ilmonen PROP-sur ;
Inge PROP-malfem ;
Ingegjerd PROP-fem ;
Instituttet PROP-org ;
Irmak PROP-plc ;
Ishtar PROP-fem ;
Isoniemi PROP-surplc ;
Jabin PROP-surmal ;
Jafet PROP-mal ;
Jaroslav PROP-mal ;
Jegindø PROP ;
Jetet PROP-obj ;
Joe PROP-mal ;
Johanne PROP-fem ;
Joseph PROP-mal ;
Josephsen PROP-sur ;
Jubal PROP-org ;
Jørn-Are PROP-mal ;
Jørstadmoen PROP-plc ;
Kainu PROP-surplc ;
Kamila PROP-fem ;
Kangassalo PROP-sur ;
Karhula PROP-surplc ;
Kari PROP-malfem ;
Karlby PROP ;
Kemuel PROP-mal ;
Kerberos PROP-ani ;
Keskimäki PROP-surplc ;
Ketty PROP-ani ;
Khankendy PROP-plc ;
Kinanen PROP-sur ;
Kirsi PROP-fem ;
Kiviniemi PROP-surplc ;
Klo PROP ;
Knud PROP-mal ;
Kockums PROP-obj ;
Kolnes PROP-sur ;
Kommuneforlaget PROP-org ;
Konga PROP-plc ;
Korkeakoski PROP-surplc ;
Koskimäki PROP-surplc ;
Krogen PROP-obj ;
Kukko PROP-sur ;
Kuukasjärvi PROP-surplc ;
Kvalø PROP ;
Kvenvik PROP-plc ;
Kyrillos PROP-mal ;
Kystartilleriet PROP-org ;
Ladstein PROP-surplc ;
Lakkala PROP-sur ;
Langåra PROP-org ;
Langø PROP ;
Lapinlampi PROP-surplc ;
Lappecodicillen PROP-obj ;
Lausanne PROP-fem ;
Lecce PROP-plc ;
Lemesós PROP-surmal ;
Lepidus PROP-surmal ;
Leppämäki PROP-surplc ;
Lestadius PROP-sur ;
Leviticus PROP-surmal ;
Levy PROP-ani ;
Liang PROP-mal ;
Libru PROP ;
Linnea PROP-fem ;
Litteratursällskapet PROP-org ;
Louvain PROP-surplc ;
Lubumbashi PROP-plc ;
Lule PROP-obj ;
Lundegrend PROP-sur ;
Lundemo PROP ;
Magda PROP-fem ;
Mahmud PROP-mal ;
Malé PROP ;
Mannila PROP-plc ;
Margrethe PROP-fem ;
Mariero PROP-sur ;
Marinus PROP-surmal ;
Marjamäki PROP-surplc ;
Martinus PROP-surmal ;
Matthew PROP-mal ;
May-Bente PROP-fem ;
Medan PROP-obj ;
Megaraskolen PROP-org ;
Michoacán PROP-surplc ;
Midgardsormen PROP-ani ;
Miguel PROP-mal ;
Miland PROP-plc ;
Mitikka PROP-sur ;
Mone PROP-fem ;
Morkemo PROP ;
Movsses PROP-mal ;
Mozilla PROP-obj ;
Muittalægje PROP-org ;
Mustajoki PROP-surplc ;
Mælebru PROP ;
Mærsk PROP-plc ;
Mürer PROP-sur ;
NKS PROP-org ;
Nakkerud PROP-surplc ;
Nenetsk PROP-obj ;
Nereus PROP-surmal ;
Netscape PROP-org ;
Nikaia PROP-fem ;
Nikodemus PROP-mal ;
Nikomediaby PROP ;
Nordarnøy PROP-plc ;
Norsklæreren PROP-obj ;
Norvegicum PROP-org ;
Noxnes PROP-sur ;
Nybø PROP ;
Nyrup PROP-surplc ;
Oen PROP-mal ;
Oksidenten PROP-plc ;
Oliva PROP-fem ;
Onesimus PROP-surmal ;
Optional PROP-obj ;
Oskar PROP-mal ;
Overhuset PROP-org ;
Paakkunainen PROP-sur ;
Pajumäki PROP-surplc ;
Patana PROP-plc ;
Pegasos PROP-ani ;
Pegasus PROP-ani ;
Per-Inge PROP-mal ;
Perseus PROP-surmal ;
Peräkylä PROP-surplc ;
PhotoDraw PROP-obj ;
Pieski PROP-sur ;
Pildaš PROP ;
Pipin PROP-surmal ;
Pitkämäki PROP-surplc ;
Provissional PROP-obj ;
Proxy PROP-org ;
Puura PROP-sur ;
Pyykkö PROP-plc ;
Périgueux PROP-surplc ;
Quincy PROP-mal ;
Ragna PROP-fem ;
Ree PROP-sur ;
Regionråd PROP-org ;
Reinbeitearkivet PROP-obj ;
Richard PROP-mal ;
Rigel PROP-org ;
Rigveda PROP-obj ;
Ringebu PROP ;
Riuttala PROP-plc ;
Robin PROP-malfem ;
Rosa PROP-fem ;
Ross PROP-sur ;
Roubaix PROP-surplc ;
Rudolf PROP-mal ;
Rødby PROP ;
SEATO PROP-org ;
Salhus PROP-sur ;
Saloniki PROP-plc ;
SamIT PROP-org ;
Samenet PROP-obj ;
Sandmo PROP ;
Sandtorv PROP-surplc ;
Sebastian PROP-mal ;
Sefo PROP-org ;
Selberg PROP-sur ;
Setúbal PROP-surplc ;
Shannon PROP-fem ;
Shapkinon PROP-plc ;
Sisyfos PROP-mal ;
Skaidiprosjektet PROP-obj ;
Skamo PROP ;
Skistad PROP-sur ;
Skogtaksasjonen PROP-org ;
Skotland PROP-plc ;
Skulerud PROP-surplc ;
Sky PROP ;
Sofie PROP-fem ;
Sosiál PROP-obj ;
Statoil PROP-org ;
Stavad PROP-plc ;
Steensen PROP-sur ;
Storebru PROP ;
Strukturmeldingen PROP-obj ;
Stubberud PROP-surplc ;
Suonperä PROP-plc ;
Svanelvmo PROP ;
Svarten PROP-ani ;
Synøve PROP-fem ;
Sámikopiija PROP-org ;
Säilä PROP-sur ;
Särkilahti PROP-surplc ;
Sørbø PROP ;
Taddeus PROP-mal ;
Taipalus PROP-surmal ;
Tajmyr PROP-plc ;
Talmud PROP-obj ;
Tapajós PROP-surmal ;
Tapiola PROP-surplc ;
Taurus PROP-ani ;
Thorgrimson PROP-sur ;
Thorsø PROP ;
Timeus PROP-surmal ;
Timex PROP-org ;
Tone PROP-fem ;
Tonga PROP-plc ;
Tony PROP-mal ;
Tornikoski PROP-surplc ;
Toyota PROP-obj ;
Tranemo PROP ;
Tuhkunen PROP-sur ;
Tulokas PROP-ani ;
Tykikos PROP-surplc ;
Tîrgu PROP-plc ;
UNIKOM PROP-org ;
Universitetet PROP-org ;
Universitetsbiblioteket PROP-obj ;
Urbanus PROP-surmal ;
Ursula PROP-fem ;
Vahter PROP-mal ;
Valais PROP-surplc ;
Valstad PROP-sur ;
Valø PROP ;
Vatikanstaten PROP-plc ;
Vegtun PROP-surplc ;
Venor PROP-org ;
Viiru PROP-ani ;
Villmarkssenter PROP-obj ;
Villmo PROP ;
Virtamo PROP-sur ;
Vrangfoss PROP-plc ;
Walborg PROP-fem ;
Wikeby PROP-sur ;
WordMail PROP-obj ;
Yahoo PROP-org ;
Yaoundé PROP ;
Yme PROP-mal ;
Zaragoza PROP-plc ;
Årstein PROP-surplc ;
Østerbø PROP ;
Øvereng PROP-sur ;
Sámi PROP-org ; ! Gen in sme, as complex namxe in nob
Sámi% allaskuvla+MWE:Sámi% allaskuvla PROP-org ;
